Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-184
Sections not exclusive.

(RULLCA 1015) Sections
21-170 to 21-184 do not preclude an entity from being merged, converted, or
domesticated under law other than the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 84.